Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-188
County board; notice; contents; public
hearing.

A
county board shall provide notice of the time when any county ordinance is
set for consideration before the board. Such notice shall appear at least
once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published or of general circulation
in the county. The notice shall contain the entire wording of the ordinance
and the time and place of the public hearing. The last publication of the
notice shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the
time set for the public hearing on the adoption of the ordinance. A county
board shall not take final action on the proposed ordinance until after at
least one public hearing has been held thereon by the county board at which
public comment regarding the proposed ordinance was permitted.

Laws 2009, LB532, § 2.